District of Columbia statutes.
8-1505

Citizen right of action.

Any person aggrieved by the failure of a generator of low-level radioactive waste in the District to comply with this chapter may sue for relief in any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may grant any declaratory or injunctive relief it deems necessary. Reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs may be awarded to the prevailing party, other than the District government, for actions brought under this section.

History

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-226, § 6, 38 DCR 219

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3705.